Missouri, session 2026, HB2313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 188.036, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 188.036, to read as follows:
188.036. 1. No physician shall perform an abortion on a woman if the physician
knows that the woman conceived the unborn child for the purpose of providing fetal organs or
tissue for medical transplantation to herself or another, and the physician knows that the
woman intends to procure the abortion to utilize those organs or tissue for such use for herself
or another.
2. No person shall utilize the fetal organs or tissue resulting from an abortion for
medical transplantation, if the person knows that the abortion was procured for the purpose of
utilizing those organs or tissue for such use.
3. No person shall offer any inducement, monetary or otherwise, to a woman or a
prospective father of an unborn child for the purpose of conceiving an unborn child for the
medical, scientific, experimental or therapeutic use of the fetal organs or tissue.
4. No person shall offer any inducement, monetary or otherwise, to the mother or
father of an unborn child for the purpose of procuring an abortion for the medical, scientific,
experimental or therapeutic use of the fetal organs or tissue.
5. No person shall knowingly offer or receive any valuable consideration for the fetal
organs or tissue resulting from an abortion, provided that nothing in this subsection shall
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2313 2
prohibit payment for burial or other final disposition of the fetal remains, or payment for a
pathological examination, autopsy or postmortem examination of the fetal remains.
6. No person or entity shall utilize the fetal organs or tissue resulting from an
elective abortion for medical, scientific, research, experimental, or therapeutic purposes
or any other use.
[6.] 7. If any provision in this section or the application thereof to any person,
circumstance or period of gestation is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the
provisions or applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared severable.
✔